Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB708.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 5720XL (3) 91 sc/ns S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 8A.367, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . d. For rental or leasing of passenger 3 vehicles operating using an internal combustion engine powered 4 by diesel fuel, that the passenger vehicleâs manufacturer 5 expressly states that the engine is capable of being powered by 6 biodiesel blended fuel classified as B-20 or higher. 7 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to contracts issued 8 or renewed under section 8A.367 on or after July 1, 2026. 9